Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7422.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative intent.
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ban Solar Radiation Modification (SRM),
weather modification, and other polluting atmospheric experiments.
(2) Attempts to alter atmospheric conditions through cloud seeding, solar radiation
modification (SRM), sunlight reflection methods (SRM), solar radiation management (SRM),
geoengineering, and other weather modification experiments and/or interventions involve the
release of pollutants, including Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS), known also
as “forever chemicals,” into the atmosphere;
(3) Environmental accumulation of combustible agents contained in aerosol materials and
other pollutants such as electromagnetic radiation released in atmospheric experiments and/or
interventions threaten public health and safety, with the potential to cause harm and desiccation of
all biological life, contributing to drought and the hazard of catastrophic forest fires; and
(4) It is therefore in the public interest to prohibit solar radiation modification (SRM),
sunlight reflection methods (SRM), solar radiation management (SRM), cloud seeding, and any
other polluting atmospheric experiments and/or interventions.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23.8

THE RHODE ISLAND CLEAN AIR PRESERVATION ACT
23-23.8-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Rhode Island Clean Air Preservation
Act".
23-23.8-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Air national guard" means the Rhode Island air national guard (RI ANG) which is the
aerial militia of the State of Rhode Island. It is not in the normal United States Air Force chain of
command. In the event that RI ANG is federalized, the governor shall form a state guard to defend
Rhode Island airspace.
(2) "Artificial intelligence (AI)" means a field of science and technology encompassing
systems and tools that can perform tasks typically requiring human intelligence, such as learning,
reasoning, pattern recognition, and decision-making, often through computational techniques like
machine learning and neural networks. AI operates within defined parameters to analyze, predict,
and execute actions based on complex datasets, with applications ranging from healthcare and
genomics to military systems and public policy.
(3) "Atmospheric activity" means any deliberate polluting experiment or intervention
conducted by any iteration of human, machine learning, or artificial intelligence (AI) or any
combination thereof, that occurs in the atmosphere and may have harmful consequences upon
health, the environment, wildlife, and/or agriculture.
(4) "Atmospheric contaminant" means any type of aerosol, biologic and/or trans-biologic
agent, chaff, genetically modified agent, graphene-oxide, metal, radioactive material, vapor,
particulate down to or less than one nanometer in diameter, smart dust, and any air pollutant
regulated by the state, any xenobiotic (foreign-to-life) electromagnetic radiation and fields,
mechanical vibration and other physical agents, or any combination of these contaminants.
(5) "Chaff" means aluminum-coated silica glass fibers typically dispersed in bundles
containing five million (5,000,000) to one hundred million (100,000,000) inhalable fibers, which
fall to the ground in about one day, or for nano-chaff years, and then fall and break apart;
Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS), known also as "forever chemicals," are an
ingredient in chaff.
(6) "Cloud seeding" means a type of weather engineering or experimentation that may
change the amount or type of precipitation by dispersing chemicals or chemical compounds such
as dry ice (CO2), silver iodide (AGI), or Tri-methyl aluminum (TMA) into the atmosphere by
means of aircraft or ground generators.
LC004132 - Page 2 of 8

(7) “Desiccate” means to dry up or cause to dry up.
(8) "Entity" means any of the following: an individual; trust; firm; joint stock company;
corporation, including a quasi-governmental corporation; non-governmental organization (NGO),
partnership; public private partnership; association; syndicate; municipality or state or municipal
agency; program; fund; fire district; club; nonprofit agency; commission; university; college or
academic institution; department or agency of the state; the federal government; or any interstate
or international governance or instrumentality thereof; including foreign, domestic and mercenary
armed services or region within the United States; artificial intelligence (AI).
(9) "Geoengineering" means the intentional large-scale alteration or manipulation of the
environment, typically involving the release of aerosols, chemicals, chemical compounds,
electromagnetic radiation and/ or other physical agents that increase air pollution and effect changes
to earth's atmosphere or surface, inclusive of solar radiation modification (SRM), solar radiation
management (SRM), sunlight reflection methods (SRM), stratospheric aerosol injection (SAI),
cirrus cloud thinning (CCT), marine cloud brightening (MCB), or cloud seeding.
(10) "Hazard" means a substance or physical agent by its nature harmful to living
organisms, generally, and/or to property or another interest of value.
(11) "Individual" means any man, woman, or child.
(12) "Intervention" means the act of interfering with weather processes, altering
atmospheric or environmental conditions, or releasing pollutants by methods including, but not
limited to, solar radiation modification (SRM), sunlight reflection methods (SRM), solar radiation
management (SRM), stratospheric aerosol injection (SAI), marine cloud brightening (MCB), cirrus
cloud thinning (CCT), weather modification, cloud seeding, or outdoor pollution dispersion
modeling.
(13) "Irradiating infrastructure" means a facility, antenna, instrument, equipment, or
satellite used for the transmission and/or reception of pulse-modulated radiofrequency/microwave
radiation for communications and other purposes.
(14) "Laser" means light amplification by stimulated emission for radiation devices. Lasers
typically have unique frequencies in the infrared, visible, or ultraviolet parts of the electromagnetic
spectrum.
(15) "Machine learning" means the process relative to AI, in which a machine can learn on
its own without being explicitly programmed.
(16) "Microelectromechanical systems (MEMS)" means miniature devices combining
electrical and mechanical components fabricated at the micrometer scale, used for sensing,
actuation, or signal processing within larger electronic or biological systems.
LC004132 - Page 3 of 8

(17) "Mote" means a self-contained wireless sensor unit, typically incorporating MEMS
components, capable of collecting, storing, and transmitting environmental or biological data.
(18) "Physical agent" means an agent other than a substance including, without limitation,
radiofrequency/microwave (RF/MW) radiation pollution and other electromagnetic radiation
pollution and fields, maser, barometric pressure, temperature, gravity, kinetic weaponry,
mechanical vibration and sound.
(19) "Pollution" means the discharge, dispersal, deposition, injection, release, seepage,
migration or escape of pollutants.
(20) "Pollutants" means any solid, liquid, gaseous, or thermal irritant, contaminant, or
substance, including smoke, vapor, soot, fumes, aerosol plumes, acid, alkalis, chemicals including,
but not limited to, barium, strontium, tri-methyl aluminum, sulfur dioxide, magnesium, chemical
compounds, coal-fly ash, chaff, artificially produced electric fields, magnetic field, electromagnetic
field, electromagnetic pulse (EMP), sound waves, sound pollution, light pollution, microwaves,
and all artificially produced ionizing or non-ionizing radiation, and/or waste. Waste includes
materials to be recycled, reconditioned or reclaimed.
(21) "Release" means any activity that results in the issuance or deposition of pollutants
such as the emitting, transmitting, dispersion, discharging or injecting of one or more nuclear,
biological, trans-biological, chemical, and/or physical agents into the ambient atmosphere, whether
once, intermittently, or continuously.
(22) "Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) division of law
enforcement (DLE)" means the RI agency responsible for investigating environmental crimes and
enforcing state and federal regulations in order to ensure compliance with all environmental
conservation laws through legal enforcement and education.
(23) "Rhode Island department of labor and training (DLT)" means the Rhode Island
agency that provides workforce development, security, and protection to the state's workers,
employers, and residents. It offers employment, educational, and economic opportunities to
individuals and employers. DLT protects the workforce by enforcing labor laws, prevailing wage
rates, and workplace health and safety standards.
(24) "Satellite" means a facility launched into earth's orbit to perform functions including,
but not limited to, transmission of electromagnetic radiation pollution via communications, global
positioning, intelligence gathering, weather forecasting, weather experimentation, weather
modification and weaponry. Currently satellites are operating in low earth orbit (LEO), medium
earth orbit (MEO), and high earth orbit (HEO).
(25) "Satellite weather modification system (SWMS)" means weather modification by
LC004132 - Page 4 of 8

satellites involving a space-based, man-made network of satellites communicating in real-time with
other satellites and ground-based infrastructure via transmission of electromagnetic radiation
pollution such as lasers.
(26) "Smart dust" is a millimeter to nanometer scale, self-contained
microelectromechanical sensor (MEMS) system comprised of microscopic wireless sensors called
"motes." Motes function as individual nodes within a larger smart dust network. Smart dust may
operate autonomously or under artificial-intelligence control as part of the Internet of Things (IoT)
or Internet of Bodies (IoB). Smart dust may be dispersed into the atmosphere, environment, or
biological systems to monitor, collect, or transmit data.
(27) "Solar radiation modification (SRM)", "sunlight reflection methods (SRM)", or "solar
radiation management (SRM)" means an experiment in the earth's climatic system involving the
release of pollutants that reduces the amount of sunlight reaching the earth's surface. SRM involves
the use of inter-operable ground-based, airborne, and space-based facilities.
(28) "State police" means the Rhode Island state police (RISP), an agency of the State of
Rhode Island responsible for statewide law enforcement and regulation, especially in areas
underserved by local police agencies and on the state's limited-access highways.
(29) "Weather engineering" means the deliberate manipulation or alteration of the
environment for the purpose of changing the weather or climate by artificial means, through
interventions involving the release of pollutants into the atmosphere via cloud seeding for small-
scale, large-scale, and global-scale alteration of the environment.
(30) "Weather modification" means any small-scale activity performed with the intention
of producing artificial changes in the composition, behavior, or dynamics of the atmosphere.
23-23.8-3. Violative activity - Prohibition on solar radiation modification (SRM),
sunlight reflection methods (SRM), solar radiation management (SRM), cloud seeding,
weather modification, or other polluting atmospheric experiments and/or interventions.
(a) No person or entity shall engage in SRM or other polluting atmospheric
experimentation and/or interventions in this state, including through the use of an aircraft, balloon,
space-based platform, ground generators, or interoperable ground-based facility.
(b) Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) division of law
enforcement (DLE) shall immediately issue and publicly report a cease-and-desist order, when an
unlawful polluting atmospheric activity is suspected. The cease-and-desist order under this section
shall have the weight of a court order and any violation shall be punished in accordance with § 23-
23.8-6.
23-23.8-4. Regulation by the state.
LC004132 - Page 5 of 8

(a) Government and armed forces projects shall meet all the requirements of this chapter.
If an activity deemed a hazard by this chapter has been approved, explicitly or implicitly, by the
federal government, the Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) division
of law enforcement (DLE) or Rhode Island state police (RISP) shall issue a notice to the appropriate
federal agency that the activity cannot lawfully be carried out within or over the state.
(b) Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) division of law
enforcement (DLE) and RISP is authorized to and shall implement this chapter, determining when
violations have occurred and if deemed necessary shall refer potentially violative activity to the
Rhode Island air national guard. Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM)
division of law enforcement (DLE), RISP, and air national guard (ANG) shall develop a policy to
determine the process for reporting and assessment of violations, referral to the national guard, and
what the enforcement procedure is, within ninety (90) days after the enactment of this chapter.
(c) If deemed necessary, the RI air national guard may interdict, document identification
tail numbers, secure photographic evidence, sample aerosolized effluents or particulates, utilize
mass spectrometers and other appropriate scientific instrumentation, and engage with aircraft
violating this section to escort them to the nearest airport for investigation, securing of evidence,
and documentation of violation.
(d) Any person who observes a geoengineering or weather modification activity conducted
in violation of this section may report the observed violation to DEM online or by telephone, mail,
or email.
(e) The department shall establish an email address and an online portal for persons to
report observed violations pursuant to this subsection. The department shall make the email address
and online portal publicly accessible on its website.
(f) The department shall establish a method for intake and screening of the reports made
pursuant to this subsection. The department shall investigate any report that warrants further review
to determine whether there are violations of this section.
(g) The department shall refer reports of observed violations made pursuant to this
subsection to the Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) division of law
enforcement (DLE), or RI ANG if appropriate.
(h) DEM shall promulgate any rules that are necessary to implement this section.
23-23.8-5. Departmental notice to cease federal or foreign-approved programs.
(a) Where an activity deemed hazardous by this chapter has been approved, explicitly or
implicitly, by the federal government or a government agency, the state police shall issue a notice
to the appropriate federal authority, agency, entity, or academic institution that the polluting
LC004132 - Page 6 of 8

intervention cannot lawfully be carried out within or over the State of Rhode Island.
(b) Government agencies or projects, academic institutions, public or private entities, and
armed forces operating within or above the State of Rhode Island shall meet all the requirements
of this chapter.
23-23.8-6. Penalties and enforcement.
(a) An entity that engages in a prohibited polluting atmospheric experiment and/or
intervention under this chapter or person who uses an unmarked or unidentified aircraft or other
vehicle or facility to carry out an experiment and/or intervention involving the release of pollutants,
or who fails to comply with the regulations set forth:
(1) Has committed a felony and shall pay a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and be
imprisoned for five (5) years; and
(2) May be guilty of a separate offense for each day during which violative activity has
been conducted, repeated, or continued.
(b) Rhode Island state police shall create an online portal for private citizens to report
alleged violations of the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The Rhode Island state police, deputies, and the Rhode Island department of
environmental management (DEM) environmental police, shall investigate all credible reports of
SRM and related microwave radiation pollution to ensure compliance with the requirements of this
chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated herein.
(5) The Rhode Island department of labor and training (DLT) shall provide technical
training and certification for independent contractors to verify reports of pollution in order to
implement the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
========
LC004132
========
LC004132 - Page 7 of 8